Hawaii, session 2026, SB1597.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 205A-22, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definitions of "special management area minor permit" and "special management area use permit" to read as follows: ""Special management area minor permit" means an action by the authority authorizing development the valuation of which is not in excess of [$500,000] $750,000 and which has no substantial adverse environmental or ecological effect, taking into account potential cumulative effects. "Special management area use permit" means an action by the authority authorizing development the valuation of which exceeds [$500,000] $750,000 or which may have a substantial adverse environmental or ecological effect, taking into account potential cumulative effects." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________